District of Columbia statutes.
19-1301.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Trust Code”.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 101 of the Uniform Trust Code.